en: Gravel/Substrate material: Clay; Coral; Glass; Quartz; Stone; Other
cs: Materiál štěrku/substrátu: Plastelína; Korálová; Sklo; Křemen; Kámen; Jiné
bg-BG: Чакъл/субстратен материал: Глина; Корал; Стъкло; Кварц; Камък; Други
nb: Grus-/substratmateriale: Leire; Korall; Glass; Kvarts; Stein; Annet
hr-HR: Materijal šljunka/supstrata: Glina; Koralj; Staklo; Kvarc; Kamen; Ostalo
sl-SI: Material peska/podlage: Glina; Korale; Steklo; Kvarc; Kamen; Drugo
sk-SK: Materiál štrku/substrátu: Hlina; Koral; Sklo; Kremeň; Kameň; Iné
fi: Soran/kasvualustan materiaali: Savi; Koralli; Lasi; Kvartsi; Kivi; Muu
da: Grus-/underlagsmateriale: Ler; Koral; Glas; Kvarts; Sten; Andet
es: Material de grava/sustrato: Arcilla; Coral; Vidrio; Cuarzo; Piedra; Otros
sv: Grus/substrat - material: Lera; Korall; Glas; Kvarts; Sten; Övrigt
pt-BR: Material de cascalho/substrato: Argila; Coral; Vidro; Quartzo; Pedra; Outro
zh-TW: 礫石/基板材料: 陶土; 珊瑚紅; 玻璃; 石英; 石頭; 其他
vi: Vật liệu sỏi/chất nền: Đất sét; San hô; Thủy tinh; Thạch anh; Đá; Khác
pt-PT: Material de cascalho/substrato: Argila; Coral; Vidro; Quartzo; Pedra; Outro
nl: Materiaal grind/ondergrond: Klei; Koraal; Glas; Kwarts; Steen; Andere
lt-LT: Žvirgždo / substrato medžiaga: Molis; Koralas; Stiklas; Kvarcas; Akmuo; Kita
zh-CN: 沙砾/铺垫物材质: 粘土; 珊瑚; 玻璃; 石英; 石头; 其他
de: Kies-/Substratmaterial: Ton; Koralle; Glas; Quartz; Stein; Sonstiges
ru: Состав грунта для аквариумов: Глина; Коралл; Стеклянные; Кварц; Камень; Другое
pl: Materiał żwirku i podłoża: Gliniana; Koralowy; Szkło; Kwarc; Kamień; Inne
ko: 자갈/기질 자재: 클레이; 산호; 유리; 석영; 석재; 기타
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำกรวดและวัสดุรองพื้น: ดินเหนียว; Coral; แก้ว; ควอตซ์; หิน; อื่นๆ
hu: Kavics/Szubsztrátum anyaga: Agyag; Korall; Üveg; Kvarc; Kő; Egyéb
tr: Çakıl/Alt katman malzemesi: Kil; Mercan; Cam; Kuvars; Taş; Diğer
ja: 砂利/基板材料: クレイ; コーラル; ガラス; クォーツ; 石; その他
ro-RO: Pietriș/material substrat: Lut; Coral; Sticlă; Cuarț; Piatră; Altele
fr: Matériau de gravier/substrat: Argile; Corail; Verre; Quartz; Pierre; Autre
it: Materiale ghiaia/substrato: Argilla; Corallo; Vetro; Quarzo; Pietra; Altro
el: Υλικό χαλικιού/υποστρώματος: Πηλός; Κοράλλι; Γυαλί; Χαλαζίας; Πέτρα; Άλλο